Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF950.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2002HV (3) 91 ss/ko H.F. 950 Section 1. Section 124E.2, subsection 10, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 10. âMedical cannabidiolâ means any pharmaceutical grade 3 cannabinoid found in the plant Cannabis sativa L. or Cannabis 4 indica or any other preparation thereof that is delivered in a 5 form recommended by the medical cannabidiol board, approved by 6 the board of medicine, and adopted by the department pursuant 7 to rule. âMedical cannabidiolâ includes flowers of the plant 8 Cannabis sativa L. or Cannabis indica in inhalable form, 9 including nebulizable forms, vaporizable dried raw cannabis, 10 and other vaporizable forms of cannabis. 11 Sec. 2. Section 124E.4, subsections 2 and 4, Code 2025, are 12 amended to read as follows: 13 2. Patient card contents. A medical cannabidiol 14 registration card issued to a patient by the department 15 pursuant to subsection 1 shall contain, at a minimum, all of 16 the following: 17 a. The patientâs full name, Iowa residence address, and date 18 of birth. 19 b. The date of issuance and expiration date of the medical 20 cannabidiol registration card. 21 c. A statement that the patient shall not possess more total 22 tetrahydrocannabinol than the patient is authorized to purchase 23 in a ninety-day period. 24 c. d. Any other information required by rule. 25 4. Primary caregiver card contents. A medical cannabidiol 26 registration card issued by the department to a primary 27 caregiver pursuant to subsection 3 shall contain, at a minimum, 28 all of the following: 29 a. The primary caregiverâs full name, residence address, and 30 date of birth. 31 b. The date of issuance and expiration date of the 32 registration card. 33 c. The medical cannabidiol registration card number of each 34 patient in the primary caregiverâs care. If the patient in the 35 -1- LSB 2002HV (3) 91 ss/ko 1/ 4 H.F. 950 primary caregiverâs care is under the age of eighteen, the full 1 name of the patientâs parent or legal guardian. 2 d. A statement that the primary caregiver shall not possess 3 more total tetrahydrocannabinol than the primary caregiver is 4 authorized to purchase in a ninety-day period. 5 d. e. Any other information required by rule. 6 Sec. 3. Section 124E.5, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. Creating packaging requirements for 9 flowers of the plant Cannabis sativa L. or Cannabis indica in 10 vaporizable form. 11 Sec. 4. Section 124E.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 16. A medical cannabidiol dispensary 14 shall not dispense inhalable forms of medical cannabidiol to a 15 patient under twenty-one years of age. 16 Sec. 5. Section 124E.12, subsection 4, paragraphs a and b, 17 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 18 a. In a prosecution for the unlawful possession of 19 marijuana under the laws of this state for the possession of 20 medical cannabidiol, including but not limited to chapters 21 124 and 453B , it is an affirmative and complete defense to 22 the prosecution that the patient has been diagnosed with a 23 debilitating medical condition, used or possessed medical 24 cannabidiol pursuant to a certification by a health care 25 practitioner as authorized under this chapter , possesses 26 total tetrahydrocannabinol in an amount that does not exceed 27 the amount of total tetrahydrocannabinol that the patient is 28 authorized to purchase in a ninety-day period, and, for a 29 patient eighteen years of age or older, is in possession of a 30 valid medical cannabidiol registration card issued pursuant to 31 this chapter . 32 b. In a prosecution for the unlawful possession of 33 marijuana under the laws of this state for the possession of 34 medical cannabidiol, including but not limited to chapters 124 35 -2- LSB 2002HV (3) 91 ss/ko 2/ 4 H.F. 950 and 453B , it is an affirmative and complete defense to the 1 prosecution that the person possessed medical cannabidiol , 2 in an amount that does not exceed the amount of total 3 tetrahydrocannabinol that the primary caregiver is authorized 4 to purchase in a ninety-day period, because the person is a 5 primary caregiver of a patient who has been diagnosed with a 6 debilitating medical condition and is in possession of a valid 7 medical cannabidiol registration card issued pursuant to this 8 chapter , and where the primary caregiverâs possession of the 9 medical cannabidiol is on behalf of the patient and for the 10 patientâs use only as authorized under this chapter . 11 Sec. 6. Section 124E.26, Code 2025, is amended to read as 12 follows: 13 124E.26 Applicability. 14 1. The provisions of this chapter apply notwithstanding any 15 other provision of law to the contrary. 16 2. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit 17 a person from manufacturing, selling, or possessing a hemp 18 product as authorized by chapter 204. 19